Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3580
Hospital Authorities Act; declaration of purpose.

It is declared that conditions resulting from the concentration of population of various counties, cities, and villages in this state require the construction, maintenance, and operation of adequate hospital facilities for the care of the public health and for the control and treatment of epidemics, for the care of the indigent and for the public welfare; that in various counties, cities, and villages of the state there is a lack of adequate hospital facilities available to the inhabitants thereof and that consequently many persons including persons of low income are forced to do without adequate medical and hospital care and accommodations; that these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the state and impair economic values; that these conditions cannot be remedied by the ordinary operations of private enterprises; that the providing of adequate hospital and medical care are public uses; that it is in the public interest that adequate hospital and medical facilities and care be provided in order to care for and protect the health and public welfare; and the necessity in the public interest for the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

It is hereby further declared as a matter of legislative determination that high interest rates are contributing to rising costs of health care, that techniques of financing health care facilities have changed, that existing financing documents may impose unnecessary burdens, and that the giving of power to hospital authorities created pursuant to sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 to refinance existing indebtedness and to utilize improved financing techniques would serve the public interest by improving the quality of health care or minimizing the cost thereof.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 801, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.75.